California statutes. Insurance Code
 investment” means an investment where all or a portion of the investment has as its primary purpose community development for, or that directly benefits, California underserved or low-to-moderate-income individuals, families, or communities. “Community development investment” includes, but is not limited to, investments in California in the following:

(1) Affordable housing, including multifamily rental and ownership housing, for underserved or low-to-moderate-income individuals or families.

(2) Community facilities or community services providers (including providers of education, health, or social services) directly benefiting underserved or low-to-moderate-income individuals, families, or communities.

(3) Economic
 development that demonstrates benefits, including, but not limited to, job creation, retention, or improvement, or provision of needed capital, to underserved or
 low-to-moderate-income individuals, families, or communities, including urban or rural communities, or businesses or nonprofit community service organizations that serve these communities.

(4) Activities that revitalize or stabilize underserved or low-to-moderate-income communities.

(5) Investments in or through California Organized Investment Network (COIN)-certified community development financial institutions (CDFIs) and investments made pursuant to the requirements of federal, state, or local community development investment programs or community development investment tax incentive programs, if these investments directly benefit underserved or low-to-moderate-income individuals, families, and communities and are consistent with this article.

(6) Community development infrastructure investments.

(7) Investments in a commercial property or properties located in underserved or low-to-moderate-income geographical areas and are consistent with this article.

(8) Investments in reservation-based communities. “Reservation-based” means an area of land managed by a Native American tribe under the jurisdiction of the federal Bureau of Indian Affairs, provided that the tribe is named on the most current list of “Indian Entities Recognized and Eligible to Receive Services From the Bureau of Indian Affairs,” or successor document, as published in the Federal Register by the Bureau of Indian Affairs.

(9) Investments in rural areas. “Rural area” means any open country or any place, town, village, or city that, by itself and taken together with any other places, towns, villages, or cities that it is part of or associated with, has either a population not exceeding 10,000 persons or has a population not exceeding 50,000 persons and is contained within a nonmetropolitan area. “Rural area” also means any open country, place, town, village, or city located within a standard MSA if the population of that area does not exceed 50,000 persons, the area is not part of, or associated with, an urban area, and the area is rural in character.

(c) “Community development infrastructure” means California debt, including all debt issued by the State of California or a California state or local government agency, if all or a portion of the debt
 has as its primary purpose community development for, or that directly benefits, underserved or low-to-moderate-income communities and is consistent with subdivision (b).

(d) “Diverse investment managers” means investment management organizations, including corporations, groups, and persons within corporations, partnerships, limited liability corporations, and other special purpose vehicles that are either located in, or actively make and hold investments in, California and whose investment managers are composed of at least 51 percent women, veterans, minorities, or lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or queer persons, or a combination of persons in those groups.

(e) “Geography” means a census tract delineated by the United States Bureau of the Census in the most recent
 decennial census.

(f) “Green investments” means investments that emphasize renewable energy projects, economic development, and affordable housing focused on infill sites so as to reduce the degree of automobile dependency and promote the use and reuse of existing urbanized lands supplied with infrastructure for the purpose of accommodating new growth and jobs. “Green investments” also means investments that can help communities grow through new capital investment in the maintenance and rehabilitation of existing infrastructure so that the reuse and reinvention of city centers and existing transportation corridors and community space, including projects offering energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy generation, including, but not limited to, solar and wind power, water and waste management, sustainable agriculture, mixed-use
 development, affordable housing opportunities, multimodal transportation systems, and transit-oriented development, can advance economic development, jobs, and housing.

(g) “Impact investments” means investments that provide a social or environmental benefit to underserved or low-to-moderate-income individuals, families, or communities in California.

(h) “High-impact investments” means investments that are innovative, responsive to community needs, not routinely provided by insurers, and provide a minimum of 50 percent social or environmental benefits to underserved or low-to-moderate-income individuals, families, or communities in California.

(i) “Insurer” means an admitted insurer as defined in Section 24,
 including the State Compensation Insurance Fund, or a domestic fraternal benefit society as defined in Section 10990.

(j) “Investment” means a lawful equity or debt investment, or loan, or deposit obligation, or other investment or investment transaction allowed by the Insurance Code.

(k) “Low-income” means an individual income that is less than 50 percent of the AMI, or a median family income that is less than 50 percent of the AMI in the case of a geographical area.

(l) “MSA” means a metropolitan statistical area as defined by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.

(m) “Moderate-income” means an individual income that is at least 50 percent but
 less than 80 percent of the AMI, or a median family income that is at least 50 percent but less than 80 percent of the AMI in the case of a geographical area.

(n) “Nonmetropolitan area” means any area that is not located in an MSA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 390, Sec. 2.   (SB 655)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

926.3.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California that (1) insurers should, where practicable, be supportive of community development investments and community development infrastructure investments, and insurers should be encouraged to invest in prudent community development investments and community development infrastructure investments that benefit California and California’s low- and moderate-income communities; (2) every admitted insurer that writes a substantial amount of insurance in the state should consider community development investments and community development infrastructure investments; and (3) the California Organized Investment Network is a part of the department, and has the responsibility to pursue active measures to
 encourage community development investing by admitted insurers.

(b) Each insurer admitted in California that writes premium in California equal to or in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) annually shall develop, and file with the commissioner no later than July 1, 2011, a policy statement on community development investments and community development infrastructure investments that expresses the insurer’s goals for these investments during the current and following calendar year. These filings shall be public information. For purposes of this subdivision, “policy statement” means a statement of principle intended to influence a decision or action. The policy statement may include general goals or specific investment goals, but is not required to contain specific investment goals or thresholds.

(c) The commissioner shall establish a link on the department’s Internet Web site that provides public access to the contents of each insurer’s policy statement and the data on community development investments and community development infrastructure investments provided by each insurer pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 384, Sec. 3.   (AB 2128)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.2. Minority, Women, LGBT, Veteran, and Disabled Veteran Business Enterprises  [927. - 927.5.]

927.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is in the state’s interest to encourage competitive business opportunities for all of its people. Insurers are uniquely positioned to build relationships within the communities they serve through the development, inclusion, and utilization of certified minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business enterprises whenever possible.

(b) It is in the state’s interest to encourage corporate leadership opportunities for all of its people. Insurers are uniquely positioned to build relationships within the communities they serve through the
 development of a corporate board that represents the diversity of the state.

(c) According to the California Insurance Diversity Survey, in 2021, among at least 1,600 board seats reported by 386 insurance companies, nearly 64 percent of those seats were occupied by Caucasians, and 62 percent of board members identified as men. Meanwhile, less than 1 percent of board members publicly identified as LGBT, 4.1 percent publicly identified as veterans, and less than 1 percent publicly identified as disabled veterans. Moreover, diverse board members from historically underrepresented communities continue to remain disproportionately low. Blacks and African Americans, Asians-Pacific Islanders, Hispanics-Latinos, and
 Native Americans comprised only 7.8 percent, 4.4 percent, 3.4 percent, and 0 percent, of board seats, respectively.

(d) An analysis by KPMG of 2020 proxy statement data from Equilar, Inc. revealed that nearly 23 percent of the directors serving on the boards of publicly held insurance companies in the Russell 3000 Index are women. At more than 35 percent of insurance companies, women comprise less than 10 percent of the board.

(e) By requiring each major insurer to report to the Insurance Commissioner, explaining the insurer’s supplier diversity statement, expressing its goals regarding certified minority, women,
 LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business enterprises, and detailing the insurer’s efforts and goals regarding board diversity, and by having the commissioner place that information on the department’s internet website, will help facilitate these relationships.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 3.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

927.1.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Control” means to exercise the power to make policy decisions.

(b) “Disabled veteran business enterprise” has the same meaning as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 999 of the Military and Veterans Code, or any successor provision. Disabled veteran business enterprise certification eligibility requirements shall be consistent with those imposed by the Department of General Services, and this section applies only to those disabled veteran business enterprises certified by the Department of General Services.

(c) “LGBT business enterprise” means a business enterprise that is 51 percent owned, managed, operated, and controlled by one or more lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender (LGBT) individuals, has been legally formed in the United States, and exercises independence from any non-LGBT business enterprise.

(d) “Minority business enterprise” means a business enterprise, physically located in the United States or its trust territories, that is at least 51 percent owned by a minority group or groups, or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minority groups, and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those individuals. “Minority” includes African Americans, Hispanic
 Americans, Native Americans, and Asian Pacific Americans.

(e) “Operate” means to be actively involved in the day-to-day management of the enterprise and not to be merely officers or directors.

(f) “Person with disabilities” means a person who identifies as having any of the following:

(1) A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities as defined by subdivision (2) of Section 12102 of Title 42 of the United States Code, also known as the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.

(2) A record of such an impairment.

(3) Being regarded as having such
 an impairment as described under subdivision (3) of Section 12102 of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.

(g) (1) “Persons with disabilities business enterprise” or “Disability-owned business enterprise” or “Disabled-owned business enterprise” means a business enterprise physically located in the United States or its trust territories, that is at least 51 percent owned by a person or persons with a disability or, in the case of a publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more persons with a disability, and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those individuals.

(2) “Disabled” means an individual who self-identifies as having a disability, as defined in
 Section 12102 of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.

(h) “Women business enterprise” means a business enterprise physically located in the United States or its trust territories, that is at least 51 percent owned by a woman or women, or, in the case of any publicly owned business at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women, and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those individuals.

(i) “Veteran business enterprise” means a business enterprise physically located in the United States or its trust territories that is at least 51 percent owned by one or more veteran groups or, in the case of a publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more veteran
 groups, and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 4.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

927.2.

(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 2020, and biennially on July 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, each admitted insurer, with California premiums written of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) or more, shall report to the commissioner on its minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business procurement efforts during the previous two years.

(2) The insurer shall provide all of the following:

(A) The insurer’s supplier diversity policy statement.

(B) The insurer’s outreach and communications to
 minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran business enterprises, including:

(i) How the insurer encourages and seeks out minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business enterprises to become potential suppliers.

(ii) How the insurer encourages its employees involved in procurement to seek out minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business enterprises to become potential suppliers.

(iii) How the insurer conducts outreach and communication to minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(iv) How the insurer supports organizations that promote or certify minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business enterprises.

(v) Information regarding appropriate contacts at the insurer for interested business enterprises.

(C) Information about which procurements are made from minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, and veteran business enterprises with a headquarters’ address in California, and from disabled veteran business enterprises, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 927.1, with each category aggregated separately, to the extent that information is readily accessible. An insurer may also include other relevant information.

(D) Information about which procurements are made from minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran business enterprises with at least a majority of the enterprise’s workforce in California, with each category aggregated separately, to the extent that information is readily accessible. An insurer may also include other relevant information.

(E) Information related to total procurement contract dollars awarded, to the extent that information is readily accessible. An insurer may also include other relevant information.

(3) An insurer that does not enter into contracts to procure goods or services in California satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2) by filing a statement with the commissioner attesting that it does not enter into
 procurement contracts in California.

(b) This section does not require quotas, set-asides, or preferences in an admitted insurer’s procurement of goods or services, and this section does not apply to insurer producer or licensee contracts. Admitted insurers retain the authority to use business judgment to select the supplier for a particular contract.

(c) This section does not preclude an admitted insurer that is a member of an insurance holding company system, as defined in Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2, from complying with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) through a single filing on behalf of the entire group of affiliated companies.

(d) Failure to report the information required by subdivision (a),
 by the reporting deadline, shall subject the admitted insurer to a civil penalty to be fixed by the commissioner, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or if the act or practice was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). An insurer may request, and the commissioner may grant, a 30-day extension to report the information if needed due to unintended or unforeseen delays. If the insurer has failed to report the information within 30 days of a written notice by the commissioner that the insurer has failed to report the information, the commissioner may find that the failure to report the information was willful and increase the civil penalty to an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The penalty imposed by this section shall be enforced by the commissioner and is appealable by means of any remedy provided by Section 12940, or by Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision is the sole means for enforcement of this section.

(e) By November 1 of the reporting year, the commissioner shall establish and maintain a link on the department’s internet website that provides public access to the contents of each admitted insurer’s reported information on minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned business procurement efforts. The commissioner shall include a statement on the department’s internet website that the information on minority, women, LGBT, persons with disabilities, veteran, and disabled veteran-owned businesses posted pursuant to this subdivision is provided for informational purposes only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 5.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

927.3.

(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 2020, and biennially on July 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, each admitted insurer with California premiums written of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) or more, shall report to the commissioner on its governing board and board diversity efforts during the previous two years.

(2) The insurer shall provide all of the following information:

(A) The demographic makeup of the insurer’s governing board.

(B) The insurer’s goals regarding board diversity, including outreach and communication strategies to
 diversify its board.

(C) A board diversity policy statement or a measurable goal or goals to include at least one diverse board member on the insurer’s board of directors. For purposes of this subparagraph:

(i) A “board diversity policy statement” is any language that refers to an insurer’s corporate governance policy or guidelines, with the goal of increasing diversity on the insurer’s board of directors. Board diversity language as part of an insurer’s corporate governance policy describes how the board considers gender, ethnicity, race, age, geographic location, sexual orientation, skills, disability, and experience when identifying director candidates and throughout the nomination process.

(ii) A “diverse board member”
 means an individual who self-identifies as a woman, nonbinary, Black, African American, Hispanic, Latino-Latina, Asian, Pacific Islander, Native American, Native Hawaiian, Alaskan Native, person with disabilities, veteran or disabled veteran, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or queer.

(b) (1) An insurer shall provide each board member with an opportunity to participate in a survey for the purpose of collecting and reporting the information described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) The insurer shall distribute a written disclosure to each board member prior to, or concurrently with, the survey. The disclosure shall notify the board member that the board member’s decision to disclose their demographic information is voluntary, that no adverse
 action may be taken against the board member or the insurer if the board member declines to participate in the survey, and that the aggregate data collected for each demographic category will be reported.

(3) The survey shall be completed using a standardized form to be specified by the commissioner.

(4) Neither an insurer nor the department shall in any way encourage, incentivize, or attempt to influence the decision of a board member to participate in the survey.

(5) An insurer required to conduct the survey shall do both of the following:

(A) Collect survey response data from board members in a manner that maintains the anonymity of the responding board member
 and the confidentiality of the data reported.

(B) Transmit the survey response data to the department in a manner that does not associate the survey response data with an individual board member.

(c) This section does not require quotas, set-asides, or preferences in regard to an admitted insurer’s governing board.

(d) This section does not preclude an admitted insurer that is a member of an insurance holding company system, as defined in Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2, from complying with subdivisions (a) and (b) through a single filing by the insurance holding company on behalf of an entire group of affiliated companies that identifies the aggregated survey results for each affiliated
 insurer.

(e) By November 1 of the reporting year, the commissioner shall establish and maintain a link on the department’s internet website that provides public access to the information submitted pursuant to this section. The commissioner shall publish the information submitted pursuant to this section in the aggregate, and shall not identify an individual respondent or insurer. The commissioner shall include a statement on the department’s internet website that the information posted pursuant to this subdivision is provided for informational purposes only.

(f) The data collected pursuant to this section is confidential and shall not be released by the department or an insurer under any circumstances, except as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 6.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

927.4.

(a) The commissioner shall establish and appoint an Insurance Diversity Task Force.

(b) The task force shall be comprised of at least 13, but not more than 15, members as follows:

(1) The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee.

(2) Two members who are representatives in the insurance industry, one of whom shall, at the time of appointment, serve as a practitioner in the field of supplier diversity, and one of whom shall, at the time of appointment, have expertise in governing board diversity.

(3) Two members who are representatives of a minority business
 enterprise.

(4) Two members who are representatives of a women business enterprise.

(5) A member who is a representative of a disabled veteran business enterprise or a veteran business enterprise.

(6) A member who is a representative of an LGBT business enterprise.

(7) A member who is representative of a persons with disabilities business enterprise.

(8) Two members with expertise in the field of supplier diversity.

(9) Two members with expertise in the field of governing board diversity.

(c) The term of each member shall be for two years. Staggered terms shall be established by drawing lots at the first meeting of the task force so that a simple majority of the members shall initially serve a two-year term, and the remainder shall initially serve a one-year term.

(d) The task force shall have all of the following duties:

(1) To advise and provide recommendations to the department on the best methods to increase procurement with diverse suppliers and to increase diversity on governing boards within the insurance industry.

(2) To meet quarterly, or as deemed necessary by the commissioner, or the commissioner’s designee.

(3) Assist the department in promoting and providing outreach to insurance companies that are actively engaged in supplier and governing board diversity issues.

(e) The members of the task force shall not receive compensation from the state for their services under this section but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with attending a task force meeting.

(f) The department shall review and revise, if necessary, the department’s conflicts of interest regulations to ensure that each task force member is required to disclose conflicts of interest to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 7.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

927.5.

The commissioner may promulgate regulations that further the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 249, Sec. 1.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.3. Single Risk Limitation [928. - 928.]

928.

(a) An admitted insurer shall not undertake any single risk or accept reinsurance on any single risk when its liability thereon in excess of the amount reinsured by reinsurance authorized for annual statement credit under this code exceeds 10 percent of its capital and surplus as shown by its last statement on file in the office of the commissioner.

(b) This section shall apply to any class or classes of insurance specified in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Part 1 of Division 1, except:

(1) Life, as defined in Section 101.

(2) Title, as defined in Section 104.

(3) Surety, as defined in Section 105.

(4) Mortgage Guaranty, as defined in Section 119.

(5) Financial Guaranty, as defined in Section 124.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.4. Wildfire Risk Information Reporting [929. - 929.3.]

929.

(a) (1) On or before April 1, 2020, and every two years thereafter, an admitted insurer with written California premiums totaling ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or more shall submit a report to the commissioner on its residential property experience data for the previous two years for policies written in California.

(2) The premium threshold for reporting shall be increased to twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) for the reports due on April 1, 2026, and shall thereafter be increased every five years by 20 percent of the threshold amount required in the year immediately preceding the increase.

(3) Reports filed on April 1, 2020, shall include data from calendar years 2018 and 2019. Subsequent reports shall likewise include data from the two calendar years immediately preceding the year in which the report is due.

(b) The commissioner may specify, by bulletin,
 the manner of submission and format of the report required pursuant to subdivision (a). The report shall include the following information reported by individual policy:

(1) Fire- or wildfire-incurred losses, if any, reported by property coverage category and the date of the loss.

(2) The public protection class or its equivalent, if utilized by the insurer.

(3) The specific numerical or other fire risk score and source of fire risk score, if applicable.

(4) Premium.

(5) ZIP Code.

(c) If the commissioner issues a
 bulletin pursuant to subdivision (b), the initial bulletin shall be posted to the department’s Internet Web site on or before May 1, 2019. Any updated bulletin shall be posted no less than two months before the date that the insurer’s report in which the changes are required is due.

(d) An insurance holding company system, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1215, may submit a consolidated report of the information required by this section for all insurers comprising the holding company system.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “policy of residential property insurance” has the meaning described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 616, Sec. 3.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

929.1.

Information submitted to the commissioner, as required by Section 929, shall be confidential pursuant to Section 7929.000 of the Government Code and exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Additionally, that information shall not be subject to subpoena or subpoena duces tecum. Testimony by the commissioner, the commissioner’s staff, an employee of the department, or a person to whom the report required by Section 929 was disclosed, regarding the contents of any report submitted pursuant to Section 929, shall be inadmissible as evidence in a civil proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 301.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

929.2.

(a) The commissioner shall post to the department’s Internet Web site a report on wildfire risk compiled from the data collected pursuant to Section 929.

(b) The report shall be updated every two years to reflect new data submitted by insurers.

(c) The report shall separately provide information each calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 616, Sec. 3.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

929.3.

(a) Failure to submit a report pursuant to Section 929 shall subject an admitted insurer to a civil penalty to be fixed by the commissioner, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or, if the act was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) An insurer may request, and the commissioner may grant, a 30-day extension, if needed due to unintended or unforeseen delays, to submit the report. If the insurer fails to submit the report within 30 days of a written notice by the commissioner regarding the failure to submit the report, the commissioner may find that the failure to submit the report was willful and increase the civil penalty
 to an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) The penalty imposed by this section shall be enforced by the commissioner and may be appealed by means of a remedy provided by Section 12940, or by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision is the sole means for enforcement of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 616, Sec. 3.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. National Association of Insurance Commissioners [930. - 934.]

930.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all domestic, foreign, and alien insurers doing business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

931.

(a) Each domestic, foreign, and alien insurer doing business in this state shall annually, on or before the first day of March of each year, file with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners a copy of its annual statement convention blank, along with any additional filings as prescribed by the commissioner for the preceding year. The information filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall be in the same format and scope as that required by the commissioner and shall include the signed jurat page and the actuarial certification. Any amendments and addendums to the annual statement filing subsequently filed with the commissioner shall also be filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(b) Each year, on or before the following dates, every domestic, foreign, and alien insurer doing business in this state shall make and file with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, in the number, form, and methods prescribed by the commissioner, a copy of the quarterly statements exhibiting its condition and affairs for the period beginning on January 1 of the current calendar year through the end of each quarter of the current year as described below. These quarterly filings shall cover the period of time beginning January 1 of the current year through and including the last day of the quarter for which the report is being made. The first quarter filing shall be filed on or before May 15th of every year. The second quarter filing shall be filed on or before August 15th of every year. The third quarter filing shall be filed on or before November 15th of every year. If any of these dates fall on a day other than a business day, then the filing is due to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners by the first business day preceding that date. The information filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall include a jurat page. A copy of any amendments and addendums to the quarterly statement filings subsequently filed with the commissioner shall also be filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(c) Foreign insurers that are domiciled in a state which has a law substantially similar to subdivision (a) of this section shall be deemed in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

932.

In the absence of actual malice, members of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, their duly authorized committees, subcommittees, and task forces, their delegates, National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ employees, and all others charged with the responsibility of collecting, reviewing, analyzing, and disseminating the information developed from the filing of the annual statement convention blanks shall be acting as agents of the commissioner under the authority of this article and shall not be subject to civil liability for libel, slander, or any other cause of action by virtue of their collection, review, and analysis or dissemination of the data and information collected from the filings required herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

933.

All financial analysis ratios and examination synopses concerning insurers that are submitted to the department by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Insurance Regulatory Information System are confidential and may not be disclosed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

934.

The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the certificate of authority of any insurer failing to file its annual or quarterly statement with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners when due or within any extension of time which the commissioner, for good cause, may grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 599, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.6. Own Risk and Solvency Assessment [935.1. - 935.11.]

935.1.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide the requirements for maintaining a risk management framework, completing an Own Risk and Solvency Assessment (ORSA), and provide guidance and instructions for filing an ORSA Summary Report with the commissioner. The requirements of this article shall apply to all insurers domiciled in this state unless exempt pursuant to Section 935.6.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the ORSA Summary Report will contain confidential and sensitive information related to an insurer’s or insurance group’s identification of risks that are material and relevant to the insurer or insurance group filing the report. This information will include proprietary and trade
 secret information that has the potential for harm and competitive disadvantage to the insurer or insurance group if the information is made public. It is the intent of the Legislature that the ORSA Summary Report shall be a confidential document filed with the commissioner, that the ORSA Summary Report shall be shared only as stated in this article to assist the commissioner in the performance of his or her duties, and that in no event shall the ORSA Summary Report be subject to public disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 935.11.)
-------------------------------------------

935.2.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) For the purpose of conducting an ORSA, the term “insurance group” shall mean those insurers and affiliates included within an insurance holding company system as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1215.

(b) The term “insurer” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1215, except that it shall not include agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state.
